Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 439 Probation and Parole
439.430.
Parole officer may arrest parolee or person subject to postincarceration supervision, when — Detention — Report to commissioner — Return of prisoner to prison — Prisoner for whose return a warrant has been issued to be deemed a fugitive from justice — Effect of violation of parole.

Any parole officer having reason to believe that a parolee or a person on postincarceration supervision pursuant to KRS

532.043

or

532.400

has violated the terms of his or her release may arrest the parolee or offender on postincarceration supervision without a warrant or may deputize any other peace officer to do so by giving him or her a written statement setting forth that the parolee or offender on postincarceration supervision, in the judgment of the parole officer, has violated the conditions of his or her release. The written statement delivered with the parolee or offender on postincarceration supervision by the arresting officer to the official in charge of the station house, jail, workhouse, or other place of detention, shall be sufficient warrant for the detention of the parolee or offender on postincarceration supervision. The parole officer who arrests or causes the arrest of the prisoner shall notify the commissioner or his or her designee at once of the arrest and detention of the parolee or offender on postincarceration supervision, and shall submit in writing a report showing in what manner there has been a violation of the conditions of release. Thereupon, if the commissioner or his or her designee believes the parolee or offender on postincarceration supervision should be returned to prison, the commissioner or his or her designee at once shall submit his or her recommendations to the board, and, if the board approves, it shall issue a warrant upon which the releasee shall be returned to prison; otherwise the prisoner shall be released upon the order of the commissioner or his or her designee.

A written statement, approved by the commissioner or his or her designee, by a parole officer, and filed with the board setting forth that the parolee or offender on postincarceration supervision in the judgment of the officer has violated the condition of his or her release, shall be sufficient cause for the board, in its discretion, to issue a warrant for the arrest of the parolee or offender on postincarceration supervision or for his or her return to prison.

A prisoner for whose return a warrant has been issued by the board, shall be deemed a fugitive from justice or to have fled from justice. If it shall appear he or she has violated the provisions of his or her release, the time from the issuing of the warrant to the date of his or her arrest shall not be counted as any part of the time to be served in determining his or her final discharge eligibility date from parole if the board in its discretion so orders.

The Parole Board may at its discretion issue a warrant for any parolee or offender on postincarceration supervision when in its judgment the condition of release has been violated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 19; 1962, ch. 109, § 3; 1966, ch. 257, § 1; 1974, Art. V, § 24(16); 1980, ch. 208, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 211, § 110, effective July 14, 1992; 2011, ch. 2, § 90, effective March 3, 2011; 2011, ch. 2, § 102, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/8/2011). This section was amended by 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2, secs. 90 and 102, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

439.440.
Prisoner returned to state custody for violation of release to be heard by board — Time.

Any prisoner returned to state custody for violation of his or her release shall be heard by the board within sixty (60) days on the propriety of his or her rerelease.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 20, effective May 18, 1956; 2020 ch. 44, § 7, effective July 15, 2020.

439.450.
Board to make investigation and report to Governor.

On request of the Governor the board shall investigate and report to him with respect to any case of pardon, commutation of sentence, reprieve or remission of fine or forfeiture.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 21, effective May 18, 1956.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Governor, commutation of sentences, granting of reprieves and pardons, Const., § 77.

439.460.
Advisory council to be appointed by Governor. [Repealed.]

439.470.
Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations for the conduct of persons placed on probation or parole, except that the commissioner shall not promulgate any administrative regulation which conflicts with the conditions of probation imposed by the court or conditions of release imposed by the board.

The commissioner may utilize an approved monitoring device as defined in KRS 532.200(5) in the supervision of persons placed on probation or parole and to impose a reasonable fee on the probationer or parolee, as a condition of probation or parole, for equipment usage.

The commissioner or his or her designee shall:

Be responsible for any reports of investigation and supervision as may be requested by the board or the courts;

Divide the Commonwealth into districts and assign probation and parole officers to serve in the various districts and courts;

Direct the work of the officers and other employees assigned to him or her;

Formulate methods of investigation, supervision, record keeping, and reports;

Conduct training courses for the staff;

Negotiate with public or private groups or institutions for further training of employees and authorize the expenditure of funds for that purpose when needed; and

Develop policies on probation and parole work in the light of other welfare administration policies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 23, effective May 18, 1956; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(16); 1980, ch. 208, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 344, § 47, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 111, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 227, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 406, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 320, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). A manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes in codifying 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 320 (this section).

Opinions of Attorney General.

If called upon by a county judge for a pre-parole report it is the parole officer’s duty to make it and if the individual is paroled, his supervision becomes a responsibility of the division of probation and parole (now Department of Corrections).

OAG 66-421

.

439.480.
Duties of probation and parole officers.

Probation and parole officers shall:

Investigate all cases referred to them for investigation by the commissioner or by any court in which they are authorized to serve;

Furnish to each person released under their supervision a written statement of the conditions of probation or parole and instruct him regarding the conditions;

Keep informed concerning the conduct and conditions of each person under their supervision and use all suitable methods to aid and encourage them to bring about improvement in their conduct and condition;

Keep detailed records of their work;

Collect and disburse all moneys in accordance with the orders of the commissioner, board, or court;

Keep accurate and complete accounts of all moneys received and disbursed in accordance with orders of the commissioner, board, or court, and give receipts therefor;

Make the reports in writing the court or commissioner may require;

Coordinate their work with that of other social agencies and file identifying information regarding their cases with any social service index or exchange operation in the area to which they are assigned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 24, effective May 18, 1956; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(16); 1980, ch. 208, § 6, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 344, § 48, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 112, effective July 14, 1992.

439.483.
Training of probation and parole officers regarding sexual offender registration laws — Necessary documents.

Each probation and parole officer shall be trained in the requirements of the sexual offender registration laws and shall be able to:

Register or reregister a sexual offender; and

Answer questions about the sexual offender registration law and its requirements.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall provide each probation and parole office with sufficient copies of the following documents to handle the expected numbers of registrants:

The sexual offender registration statutes and any administrative regulations which are promulgated relating to sexual offender registration;

A brochure explaining in lay person’s terms the requirements of the sex offender registration laws and administrative regulations;

Registration forms;

Fingerprint cards; and

Other documents and supplies necessary to register a sexual offender.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 182, § 26, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 321, effective June 26, 2007.

439.485.
Probation and parole officer’s position considered hazardous duty for retirement purposes.

The position of probation and parole officer shall be considered as a hazardous duty position within the meaning of KRS

61.592

and the department shall make the employer contributions required for participation in the Hazardous Duty Retirement Program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 211, § 2, effective July 15, 1982.

439.490.
Competitive examinations for employes. [Repealed.]

439.500.
Prohibited activities of probation and parole officers.

No probation or parole officer of the department shall:

Use his office to influence elections, or to influence the political action of any person;

Serve as a member of the campaign committee of any political party;

Interfere with or participate in the preparation for any election, or the conduct thereof at the polling place, or with the election officers while they are performing their duties;

Be in any manner concerned in demanding, soliciting, or receiving any assessments, subscriptions, or contributions, whether voluntary or involuntary, for any political party or candidate.

It shall be unlawful for any person to be in any way concerned with demanding or soliciting assessments, subscriptions, or contributions for any political party or candidate from any member or employee of the Department of Corrections.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 26, effective May 18, 1956; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(16); 1980, ch. 208, § 7, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 344, § 49, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 98, effective July 14, 1992.

439.510.
Information obtained by probation or parole officer to be privileged — Exception.

All information obtained in the discharge of official duty by any probation or parole officer shall be privileged and shall not be received as evidence in any court. Such information shall not be disclosed directly or indirectly to any person other than the court, board, cabinet, or others entitled under KRS

439.250

to

439.560

to receive such information, unless otherwise ordered by such court, board or cabinet. Information shall be made available to sex offender treatment programs operated or approved by the Department of Corrections or the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities who request the information in the course of conducting an evaluation or treatment pursuant to KRS 439.265(6), 532.045(3), or 532.050(4).

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 27, effective May 18, 1956; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1980, ch. 208, § 8, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 344, § 50, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 300, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 401, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2012, ch. 146, § 118, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 76, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2012). This statute was amended by 2012 Ky. Acts chs. 146 and 158, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

439.520.
Fiscal court to supply suitable office space for probation, parole and conditional release officer. [Repealed.]

439.530.
Application of KRS 439.250 to 439.560. [Repealed.]

439.540.
Powers of department.

The department, with the written approval of the secretary and the Governor, may:

Enter into an agreement with the governing body of any county or city of this state for their payment of part of the costs of the performance of services within the county or city by the department relating to any parole or probation;

Accept from the United States of America or any of its agencies the advisory services, funds, equipment, and supplies available to this state for any of the purposes contemplated by KRS

439.250

to

439.560

;

Enter into contracts and agreements with the United States or any of its agencies, or with any independent or private agency as necessary, proper, and convenient, not contrary to the laws of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 30, effective May 18, 1956; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(16); 1980, ch. 208, § 9, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 344, § 51, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 99, effective July 14, 1992.

439.550.
Probation by District Court — Supervision by Department of Corrections, or by adult misdemeanant probation and work release agency of urban-county government.

If any District Court places a person on probation following a conviction of crime, either upon verdict or plea, the court may request that the defendant be under the supervision of the Department of Corrections.

In counties containing an urban-county form of government, the urban-county council shall provide for supervision of a person placed on probation or work release by the District Court of the county following a conviction of crime, either upon a verdict or plea, under the supervision of an adult misdemeanant probation and work release agency of the urban-county government. The employees of the agency shall be classified civil service employees of a correctional services division created under KRS

67A.028

and shall be subject to the direction of the judges of the District Court in the performance of their duties. There shall be the number of employees of said agency, including clerical personnel, as necessary for the operation of the agency, and they shall receive reasonable salaries to be fixed by the urban-county council which salaries shall be paid out of the urban-county treasury.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 32, effective May 18, 1956; 1970, ch. 256, § 1; 1972, ch. 290, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1974, ch. 406, § 330; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 449, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 76, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 344, § 52, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 100, effective July 14, 1992; 2003, ch. 59, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2017 ch. 167, § 20, effective June 29, 2017.

439.551.
Graduated sanctions for probation violations — Administrative regulations.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to develop a system of graduated sanctions for responding to technical violations of probation. The department shall consult with the Supreme Court when promulgating these administrative regulations.

The administrative regulations shall create a system of graduated sanctions with the following objectives:

Responding quickly and consistently to violations of probation, based on the nature of the violation and the risk level of the supervised individual;

Reducing the time and resources expended by the department and the courts to respond to violations; and

Reducing the commission of new crimes and revocation rates.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 56, effective June 8, 2011.

439.552.
Early termination of probation — Administrative regulations.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in consultation with the Supreme Court to establish procedures to:

Recommend to the court the early termination of probation for a supervised individual who has:

Fulfilled the terms of his or her case plan;

No new arrests;

Demonstrated a reduction in criminal risk factors upon reassessment; and

Fulfilled all restitution and substantially fulfilled all other financial obligations to the court; and

Review the compliance of the supervised individual on probation with the requirements in paragraph (a) of this subsection. This review for compliance shall occur at the same time as the regular reassessment pursuant to KRS

439.3101

and

439.3104

.

The department shall petition the court with a request for early termination if the supervised individual on probation has:

Complied with the requirements in subsection (1)(a) of this section;

Completed at least eighteen (18) months of his or her term of supervision; and

Not violated the terms of his or her supervision in the last twelve (12) months.

Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the interstate commission;

The department may establish by administrative regulation conditions for overriding the recommendation of early termination of probation.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 57, effective June 8, 2011.

439.553.
Judicial determination of conditions of community supervision.

For supervised individuals on probation, the court having jurisdiction of the case shall determine the conditions of community supervision and may impose as a condition of community supervision that the department supervising the individual shall, in accordance with KRS

439.3108

, impose graduated sanctions adopted by the department for violations of the conditions of community supervision.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 61, effective June 8, 2011.

439.555.
Conditional release of certain prisoners.

Any prisoner having served the term for which he has been sentenced for a crime he committed after June 16, 1972, less good time deduction, if any has been accumulated, shall be released by minimum expiration of sentence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 292, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1980, ch. 208, § 10, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 445, § 11, effective July 14, 1992.

439.560.
Compact with other states for out-of-state parolee supervision. [Repealed.]